South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S238.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Sine Die Adjournment, extended session conditions SECTION 1.    Section 2-1-180 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 2-1-180.    (A) The regular annual session of the General Assembly shall adjourn sine die each year not later than five o'clock p.m. on the second Thursday in May. The regular annual session of the General Assembly can be extended: (1) if the House of Representatives fails to give a third reading to the annual general appropriations bill by March thirty-first, the date of sine die adjournment is extended by one statewide day for each statewide day after March thirty-first that the House of Representatives fails to give the bill third reading; (2) if the general appropriations bill or Capital Reserve Fund resolution is not completed by the sine die adjournment date, the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives may call their respective bodies into session at any time after the date of sine die adjournment and until the last day in June to complete those matters and any conference committees appointed on or before the date of sine die adjournment; (3) if a forecast reduction is submitted by the Board of Economic Advisors pursuant to Section 11-9-880 after April tenth for the next fiscal year, the adjournment date for the General Assembly may be extended up to two weeks with the agreement of the Speaker of the House and the President of the Senate; or (4) if a concurrent resolution is adopted by a two-thirds vote of both the Senate and House of Representatives not later than five o'clock p.m. on the second Thursday in May. During the time between five o'clock p.m. on the second Thursday in May and the extended sine die adjournment date, as set forth herein, no legislation or other business may be considered except any matters approved for consideration by a concurrent resolution adopted by two-thirds vote in both houses. (B) For the purposes of the Administrative Procedures Act, the period that the General Assembly has to review state regulations is tolled from the second Friday in May through the second Monday in January. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 13th day of May, 2026. Vetoed by the Governor -- 5/18/26. Veto overridden by Senate -- 6/25/26. Veto overridden by House -- 6/25/26. __________